Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.06
Waiver of evaluations and notices;
void and unenforceable.

Any waiver of the evaluations and notices provided for in
subdivision (4) of section 28-327 is void and unenforceable.

Laws 2010, LB594, § 5.